Georgia statutes. TITLE 25 Fire Protection and Safety
Article 4 Carnival Ride Safety

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 4/SB 446, redesignated Chapter 13 of Title 34 as this article.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Carnival Ride Safety Act, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Labor, Inspection - Child Labor Regulations, Chapter 300-8-2.

25-15-80.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Carnival Ride Safety Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

34-13-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 330, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1945, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-15-80

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 4/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-13-1 as present Code Section 25-15-80, and, in this Code section, substituted “article” for “chapter”.

25-15-81.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Authorized person” means a competent person experienced and instructed in the work to be performed who has been given the responsibility to perform his or her duty by the owner or the owner’s representative.

“Carnival ride” means any mechanical device, other than amusement rides regulated under Article 3 of this chapter, known as the “Amusement Ride Safety Act,” which carries or conveys passengers along, around, or over a fixed or restricted route or course or within a defined area for the purpose of giving its passengers amusement, pleasure, thrills, or excitement. Such term shall not include any such device which is permanently fixed to a site.

“Certificate fee” means the fee charged by the office for a certificate to operate a carnival ride.

“Certificate of inspection” means a certificate issued by a licensed inspector that a carnival ride meets all relevant provisions of this article and the standards and regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

“Commissioner” means the Safety Fire Commissioner.

“Licensed inspector” means a registered professional engineer or any other person who is found by the office to possess the requisite training and experience to perform competently the inspections required by this article and who is licensed by the office to perform inspections of carnival rides.

“Office” means the office of Safety Fire Commissioner, which is designated to enforce the provisions of this article and to formulate and enforce standards and regulations.

“Operator” means a person or persons actually engaged in or directly controlling the operation of a carnival ride.

“Owner” means a person, including the state or any of its subdivisions, who owns a carnival ride or, in the event that the carnival ride is leased, the lessee.

“Permit” means a permit to operate a carnival ride issued to an owner by the office.

“Permit fee” means the fee charged by the office for a permit to operate a carnival ride.

“Standards and regulations” means those standards and regulations formulated and enforced by the office.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-13-2, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 330, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1945, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 34; Ga. L. 1995, p. 366, § 6; Ga. L. 2001, p. 873, § 22; Code 1981, §

25-15-81

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 4/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-13-2 as present Code Section 25-15-81; substituted “article” for “chapter” and substituted “office” for “department” throughout this Code section; deleted former paragraph (1), which read: “Reserved.”; redesignated former paragraph (2) as present paragraph (1), and, in paragraph (1), inserted “or her”; redesignated former paragraph (3) as present paragraph (2), and, in paragraph (2), substituted “Article 3 of this chapter” for “Chapter 12 of this title” in the first sentence; redesignated former paragraph (3.1) as present paragraph (3); substituted “Safety Fire Commissioner” for “Commissioner of Labor” in paragraph (5); deleted former paragraph (6), which read: “ ‘Department’ means the Department of Labor, which is designated to enforce the provisions of this chapter and to formulate and enforce standards and regulations.”; redesignated former paragraph (7) as present paragraph (6); and added present paragraph (7).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1987, “the” was inserted in paragraph (5).

25-15-82.
Authority to consult.

The Commissioner shall be authorized to consult with persons knowledgeable in the area of the carnival ride industry and to create committees composed of such consultants to assist the Commissioner in carrying out his or her duties under this article.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-13-3, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 330, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 443, § 4; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1945, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 873, § 23; Code 1981, §

25-15-82

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 4/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-13-3 as present Code Section 25-15-82, and substituted “article” for “chapter” in this Code section.

25-15-83.
Safety standards and regulations; licensing of inspectors; ride permits; fees.

The office shall formulate standards and regulations, or changes to such standards and regulations, for the safe assembly, disassembly, repair, maintenance, use, operation, and inspection of all carnival rides. The standards and regulations shall be reasonable and based upon generally accepted engineering standards, formulas, and practices pertinent to the industry. Formulation and promulgation of such standards and regulations shall be subject to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

The office shall:

Enforce all standards and regulations;

License inspectors for authorization to inspect carnival rides; and

Issue permits upon compliance with this article and such standards and regulations adopted pursuant to this article.

The owner or operator of a carnival ride required to be inspected shall pay fees as prescribed in rules and regulations promulgated by the Commissioner. The chief inspector shall transfer all fees so received to the general fund of the state treasury. All funds so deposited in the state treasury are authorized to be appropriated by the General Assembly to the Safety Fire Commissioner.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-13-5, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 330, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1945, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 258, § 5; Ga. L. 2001, p. 873, § 24; Code 1981, §

25-15-83

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 4/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-13-5 as present Code Section 25-15-83; substituted “office” for “department” near the beginning of subsection (a) and in the introductory paragraph of subsection (b); deleted the fourth sentence of subsection (a), which read: “No rule, regulation, or standard promulgated or adopted pursuant to this chapter article shall become effective prior to January 1, 1987.”; twice substituted “article” for “chapter” in paragraph (b)(3); and substituted “Safety Fire Commissioner” for “Commissioner of Labor” at the end of the last sentence of subsection (c).

25-15-84.
Licensing of private inspectors.

The office may license such private inspectors as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this article.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-13-6, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 330, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1945, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-15-84

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 4/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-13-6 as present Code Section 25-15-84, and, in this Code section, substituted “office” for “department”, and substituted “article” for “chapter”.

25-15-85.
Permit required; application; engineering evaluation.

No carnival ride shall be operated in any calendar year, except for purposes of testing and inspection, until a permit for its operation has been issued by the office. The owner of a carnival ride shall apply for a permit to the office on a form furnished by the office, providing such information as the office may require.

Beginning January 1, 2018, no permit for a carnival ride to operate in this state shall be issued by the office until the carnival owner submits an engineering evaluation from a licensed engineer that evaluates the functionality of safety mechanisms and the condition of the critical components of the carnival ride. The scope of such engineering evaluation may be further prescribed by standards and regulations of the office that are consistent with this subsection. Such evaluation shall be provided prior to the annual inspection required by Code Section 25-15-86 and use of the carnival ride by the general public. The submission of such evaluation shall only be required the first time the carnival owner applies for a permit for the carnival ride in this state on or after January 1, 2018.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-13-7, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 330, § 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 950, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1945, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-15-85

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 4/SB 446; Ga. L. 2017, p. 578, § 1/SB 141.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-13-7 as present Code Section 25-15-85, and substituted “office” for “department” throughout this Code section.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, designated the existing provisions of this Code section as subsection (a); and added subsection (b).

25-15-86.
Inspections.

All carnival rides and attractions shall be inspected annually and may be inspected more frequently by a licensed inspector at the owner’s or operator’s expense. If the carnival ride meets all relevant provisions of this article and the standards and regulations adopted pursuant to this article, the licensed inspector shall provide to the owner or operator a certificate of inspection. All new carnival rides shall be inspected before commencing public operation.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-13-8, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 330, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1945, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 258, § 6; Code 1981, §

25-15-86

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 4/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-13-8 as present Code Section 25-15-86, and, in this Code section, substituted “a licensed inspector” for “the Office of Safety Engineering of the department” in the first sentence, and twice substituted “article” for “chapter” in the second sentence.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, “owner’s” was substituted for “owner” in the first sentence.

25-15-87.
Waiver of inspection for rides inspected by other entity.

The office may waive the requirement of Code Section 25-15-86 if the owner of a carnival ride gives satisfactory proof to the office that the carnival ride has passed an inspection conducted by a federal agency or by another state whose standards and regulations for the inspection of such a carnival ride are at least as stringent as those adopted pursuant to this article.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-13-9, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 330, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1945, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 366, § 7; Code 1981, §

25-15-87

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 4/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-13-9 as present Code Section 25-15-87, and, in this Code section, substituted “office” for “department” twice, substituted “25-15-86” for “34-13-8”, and substituted “article” for “chapter” at the end.

25-15-88.
Issuance of permit.

The office shall issue a permit to operate a carnival ride to the owner thereof upon successful completion of a safety inspection by a licensed inspector, upon completion by the owner of the application for a permit, and upon presentation of a certificate of inspection or waiver thereof by the office. The permit shall be valid for the calendar year in which issued.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-13-10, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 330, § 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 950, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1945, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-15-88

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 4/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-13-10 as present Code Section 25-15-88, and twice substituted “office” for “department” in the first sentence of this Code section.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, “upon” was inserted preceding “presentation” near the end of the first sentence.

25-15-89.
Maintenance, inspection, and repair records.

The owner shall maintain up-to-date maintenance, inspection, and repair records between inspection periods for each carnival ride in accordance with such standards and regulations as are adopted pursuant to this article. Such records shall contain a copy of all inspection reports commencing with the last annual inspection, a description of all maintenance performed, and a description of any mechanical or structural failures or operational breakdowns and the types of actions taken to rectify these conditions.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-13-11, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 330, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1945, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-15-89

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 4/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-13-11 as present Code Section 25-15-89, and substituted “article” for “chapter” in the first sentence of this Code section.

25-15-90.
Ride operators; minimum standards for operation of rides.

No person shall be permitted to operate a carnival ride unless he or she is at least 16 years of age. An operator shall be in attendance at all times that a carnival ride is in operation and shall operate no more than one carnival ride at any given time.

No carnival ride shall be operated at standards below those recommended by the manufacturer of such carnival ride or below the standards adopted or variants approved by the office, whichever is greater.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-13-12, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 330, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1945, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-15-90

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 4/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-13-12 as present Code Section 25-15-90; inserted “or she” in the first sentence of subsection (a); and substituted “office” for “department” near the end of subsection (b).

25-15-91.
Accident reports.

The owner of the carnival ride shall report to the office any accident incurred during the operation of any carnival ride resulting in a fatality or an injury requiring medical attention from a licensed medical facility. The report shall be in writing, shall describe the nature of the occurrence and injury, and shall be delivered in person or mailed by first-class mail no later than the close of the next business day following the accident. Accidents resulting in a fatality shall also be reported immediately to the office in person or by phone in accordance with regulations adopted by the office.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-13-13, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 330, § 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 950, § 3; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1945, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 873, § 25; Code 1981, §

25-15-91

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 4/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-13-13 as present Code Section 25-15-91, and substituted “office” for “department” throughout this Code section.

25-15-92.
Liability insurance, bond, or other security required.

No person shall operate a carnival ride unless at the time there is in existence:

A policy of insurance in an amount not less than $1 million (if an independent contractor) against liability for injury to persons arising out of the operation of the carnival ride;

A bond in a like amount; provided, however, that the aggregate liability of the surety under such bond shall not exceed the face amount thereof; or

Cash or other security acceptable to the office.

Regulations under this article shall permit appropriate deductibles or self-insured retention amounts to such policies of insurance. The policy or bond shall be procured from one or more insurers or sureties acceptable to the office.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-13-14, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 330, § 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 950, § 4; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1945, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 34; Code 1981, §

25-15-92

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 4/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-13-14 as present Code Section 25-15-92; substituted “office” for “department” at the end of paragraph (a)(3) and at the end of subsection (b); and substituted “article” for “chapter” in the first sentence of subsection (b).

25-15-93.
Variances from standards and regulations.

If any person would incur practical difficulties or unnecessary hardships in complying with the standards and regulations adopted pursuant to this article, or if any person is aggrieved by any order issued by the office, the person may make a written application to the office stating his or her grounds and applying for a variance. The office may grant such a variance in the spirit of the provisions of this article with due regard to public safety. The granting or denial of a variance by the office shall be in writing and shall describe the conditions under which the variance is granted or the reasons for denial. A record shall be kept of all variances granted by the office and such record shall be open to inspection by the public.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-13-15, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 330, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1945, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-15-93

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 4/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-13-15 as present Code Section 25-15-93, and, in this Code section, substituted “office” for “department” throughout, substituted “article” for “chapter” in the first and second sentences, and inserted “or her” near the end of the first sentence.

25-15-94.
Exempted rides.

This article shall not apply to any single-passenger coin operated carnival ride on a stationary foundation or to playground equipment such as swings, seesaws, slides, jungle gyms, rider propelled merry-go-rounds, moonwalks, and live rides.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-13-16, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 330, § 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 950, § 5; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1945, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-15-94

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 4/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-13-16 as present Code Section 25-15-94, and substituted “article” for “chapter” near the beginning of this Code section.

25-15-95.
Existing rides.

This article shall not be construed so as to prevent the use of any existing carnival ride found to be in a safe condition and to be in conformance with the standards and regulations adopted pursuant to this article.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-13-17, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 330, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1945, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-15-95

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 4/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-13-17 as present Code Section 25-15-95, and, in this Code section, twice substituted “article” for “chapter” in the first sentence, and deleted the second sentence, which read: “Owners of carnival rides in operation on or before March 26, 1986, shall comply with the provisions of this chapter and the standards and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter within six months after the adoption of said standards and regulations.”

25-15-96.
Order for temporary cessation; injunction; penalties.

The Commissioner or the Commissioner’s authorized representative may issue a written order for the temporary cessation of operation of a carnival ride if it has been determined after inspection to be hazardous or unsafe. Operations shall not resume until such conditions are corrected to the satisfaction of the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s authorized representative.

In the event that an owner or operator knowingly allows the operations of a carnival ride after the issuing of a temporary cessation, the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s authorized representative may initiate in the superior court any action for an injunction or writ of mandamus upon the petition of the district attorney or Attorney General. An injunction, without bond, may be granted by the superior court to the Commissioner for the purpose of enforcing this article.

Any person, firm, partnership, or corporation violating the provisions of this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Each day of violation shall constitute a separate offense.

In addition to the penalty provisions in paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Commissioner shall have the power, after notice and hearing, to levy civil penalties as prescribed in the rules and regulations of the office in an amount not to exceed $5,000.00 upon any person, firm, partnership, or corporation failing to adhere to the requirements of this article and the rules and regulations promulgated under this article. The imposition of a penalty for a violation of this article or the rules and regulations promulgated under this article shall not excuse the violation or permit it to continue.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-13-18, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 330, § 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 950, § 6; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1945, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 366, § 8; Code 1981, §

25-15-96

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 4/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-13-18 as present Code Section 25-15-96; substituted “article” for “chapter” throughout this Code section; substituted “the Commissioner’s authorized representative” for “his authorized representative” in the first and second sentences of subsection (a) and in the first sentence of subsection (b); and substituted “office” for “department” near the middle of the first sentence of paragraph (c)(2).

Cross references.

Punishment for misdemeanors generally, §

17-10-3

.

25-15-97.
Owner or operator denying individual entry to ride.

The owner or operator of a carnival ride may deny entry to a person to a carnival ride if in the owner’s or operator’s opinion the entry may jeopardize the safety of such person or the safety of any other person. Nothing in this Code section shall permit an owner or operator to deny an inspector access to a carnival ride when such inspector is acting within the scope of his or her duties under this article.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-13-19, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 330, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1945, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-15-97

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 4/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-13-19 as present Code Section 25-15-97, and, in the second sentence of this Code section, substituted “shall permit” for “will permit”, inserted “or her”, and substituted “article” for “chapter”.

25-15-98.
Posting of age, size, and weight requirements for rides.

The owner or operator of a carnival ride shall post a clearly visible sign at the location of each ride and at the location of tickets sales for each ride which states any age, weight, or height requirements of the ride which are necessary as a safeguard against injury.

It shall be unlawful for any owner or operator to permit entry to a carnival ride to any person who does not meet the posted age, size, and weight requirements for such ride.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-13-20, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1945, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-15-98

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 4/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-13-20 as present Code Section 25-15-98.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, a misspelling of the word “requirements” in subsection (b) was corrected.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1990, p. 1945, § 1, designated the former provisions of this Code section as Code Section 34-13-22.

25-15-99.
Itinerant carnival rides to be continuously registered with in-state agent.

The owner of any itinerant carnival ride which is located within this state shall continuously maintain in this state a registered agent of record who may be an individual who resides in the state and whose business address is identical with the address of the owner’s required office.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-13-21, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1945, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-15-99

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 4/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-13-21 as present Code Section 25-15-99, and, in this Code section, substituted “within this state shall” for “within the state must” near the beginning, and substituted “registered agent of record who may” for “registered agent of record, which agent may” near the middle.

25-15-100.
State liability not created.

Neither this article nor any provision of this article shall be construed to place any liability on the State of Georgia, the office, or the Commissioner with respect to any claim by any person, firm, or corporation relating in any way whatsoever to carnival rides and any injury or damages arising therefrom.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-13-20, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 330, § 2; Code 1981, § 34-13-22, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1945, § 1; Code 1981, §

25-15-100

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 4/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-13-22 as present Code Section 25-15-100, and, in this Code section, twice substituted “article” for “chapter” near the beginning, and substituted “office” for “department” near the middle.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1990, p. 1945, § 1 redesignated the former provisions of Code Section 34-13-20 as this Code section.

25-15-101.
Regulation of carnival rides by counties, municipalities, and other political subdivisions.

No county, municipality, or other political subdivision shall have the power to pass ordinances, resolutions, or other requirements regulating the construction, installation, inspection, maintenance, repair, or operation of carnival rides within the limits of such county, municipality, or other political subdivision. Any such ordinances, resolutions, or other requirements shall be void and of no effect; provided, however, that the provisions of this Code section shall not apply to local zoning ordinances or ordinances regulating location, siting requirements, or other development standards or conditions relative to carnival rides or their time of operation or noise levels generated. Nothing in this article preempts the imposition of regulatory fees or occupation taxes imposed by counties and municipalities pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 48.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-13-23, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 366, § 9; Code 1981, §

25-15-101

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 4/SB 446.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 2, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-13-23 as present Code Section 25-15-101, and, in this Code section, deleted “heretofore passed” preceding “shall be void” in the second sentence, and substituted “article” for “chapter” in the last sentence.